Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-523
Bonds; authorized investment.

All public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies; all banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks, financial institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, money, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a contracting public body pursuant to the Nebraska Redevelopment Act and such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this section to authorize any person, political subdivision, and officer, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. However, nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in the selection of securities.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 23.